Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.060

Use of property tax allocation revenues for revitalization financing—Opting out—Partial participation.

(1) Participating taxing districts must allow the use of all of their local property tax allocation revenues for local revitalization financing.

(2)(a) If a taxing district does not want to allow the use of its property tax revenues for the local revitalization financing of public improvements in a revitalization area, its governing body must adopt an ordinance to remove itself as a participating taxing district and must notify the sponsoring local government.

(b) The taxing district must provide a copy of the adopted ordinance and notice to the sponsoring local government creating the revitalization area before the anticipated date that the sponsoring local government proposes to adopt the ordinance creating the revitalization area as provided in the notice required by RCW 39.104.040(1)(a).

(3) If a taxing district wants to become a participating taxing district by allowing one or more but not all of its regular property tax levies to be used for the calculation of local property tax allocation revenues, it may do so through an interlocal agreement specifying the regular property taxes that will be used for calculating its local property tax allocation revenues. This subsection does not authorize a taxing district to allow the use of only part of one or more of its regular property tax levies by the sponsoring local government.

(4) If a taxing district wants to participate on a partial basis by providing a specified amount of money to a sponsoring local government to be used for local revitalization financing for a specified amount of time, it may do so through an interlocal agreement. However, the taxing district must adopt an ordinance as described in subsection (2) of this section to remove itself as a participating taxing district for purposes of calculating property tax allocation revenues and instead partially participate through an interlocal agreement outlining the specifics of its participation.

[ 2010 c 164 s 4; 2009 c 270 s 106.]